Mississippi, session 2026, HB4045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-7-30, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-7-30.  (1)  (a)  As used in this subsection, "qualified business or industry" means any company, and its affiliates, that * * * has have been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi). (b)  A qualified business or industry shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter on income arising from a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) only, and all other income shall be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.  The exemption does not apply to activities subject to Mississippi income tax prior to certification of the project. (c)  The income tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall not exceed twenty (20) years.  A qualified business or industry must create at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) jobs prior to receiving the exemption authorized by this subsection and may elect the date upon which the twenty-year period will begin; however, the date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the qualified business or industry begins commercial production. (d)  In the event that the monthly average number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry falls below one thousand five hundred (1,500) jobs, the tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall be reduced as follows: (i)  If the monthly average number of full-time jobs for a taxable year is more than one thousand four hundred (1,400) but less than one thousand five hundred (1,500), the amount of the exemption shall be reduced by one percent (1%) for the taxable year. (ii)  If the monthly average number of full-time jobs for a taxable year is more than one thousand one hundred (1,100) but less than one thousand four hundred one (1,401), then the amount of the exemption shall be reduced by twenty percent (20%) for the taxable year. (iii)  If the monthly average number of full-time jobs for the taxable year is more than eight hundred (800) but less than one thousand one hundred one (1,101), then the amount of the exemption shall be reduced by forty percent (40%) for the taxable year. (iv)  If the monthly average number of full-time jobs for the taxable year is more than five hundred (500) but less than eight hundred one (801), then the amount of the exemption shall be reduced by sixty percent (60%) for the taxable year. (v)  If the monthly average number of full-time jobs for the taxable year is more than two hundred (200) but less than five hundred one (501), then the amount of the exemption shall be reduced by eighty percent (80%) for the taxable year. (vi)  If the monthly average number of full-time jobs for the taxable year is two hundred (200) or less, the qualified business or industry shall not be eligible for the exemption for the taxable year. (2)  (a)  As used in this subsection, "qualified business or industry" means any company, and its affiliates, that * * * has have been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii). (b)  A qualified business or industry shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter on income arising from a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) only, and all other income shall be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.  The exemption does not apply to activities subject to Mississippi income tax prior to certification of the project. (c)  The income tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall not exceed twenty (20) years unless the qualified business or industry creates and maintains for a period of three (3) years not less than one thousand (1,000) jobs, in which case the exemption period shall be extended by five (5) years. (d)  In the event that the annual average number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry falls below the qualified business or industry's job commitment for two (2) consecutive years, the tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall be suspended until the first tax year during which the annual average number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry reaches the qualified business or industry's job commitment. (3)  (a)  As used in this subsection, "qualified business or industry" means any company, and its affiliates, that * * * has have been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix). (b)  A qualified business or industry shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter on income arising from a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) only, and all other income shall be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.  The exemption does not apply to activities subject to Mississippi income tax prior to certification of the project. (c)  The income tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall not exceed twenty-five (25) years.  A qualified business or industry must create the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry and may elect the date upon which the twenty-five-year period will begin; however, the date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the qualified business or industry begins commercial production. (d)  In the event that the annual number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry falls below the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry for two (2) consecutive years, the tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall be suspended until the first tax year during which the annual number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry reaches the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry. (e)  The qualified business or industry shall be entitled to utilize a single sales apportionment factor in the calculation of its liability for income tax imposed by this chapter for any year for which it files a Mississippi income tax return.  The qualified business or industry shall be entitled to continue to utilize such single sales apportionment factor notwithstanding a suspension of the income tax exemption pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection. (4)  (a)  As used in this subsection, "qualified business or industry" means any company, and its affiliates, that * * * has have been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx). (b)  A qualified business or industry shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter on income arising from a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx) only, and all other income shall be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.  The exemption does not apply to activities subject to Mississippi income tax prior to certification of the project. (c)  The income tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall not exceed twenty (20) years.  A qualified business or industry must create at least one thousand (1,000) jobs prior to receiving the exemption authorized by this subsection and may elect the date upon which the twenty-year period will begin; however, the date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the qualified business or industry begins commercial production and in no event later than December 31, 2022. (5)  (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Affiliate" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(k)(iii); (ii) "Qualified business or industry" means any company that has been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii), or any other company which becomes subject to the tax levied by this chapter because it is an affiliate, successor or assignee of the company that has been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii). (b)  A qualified business or industry shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter on income arising from a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxii) only, and all other income shall be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.  The exemption does not apply to activities subject to Mississippi income tax prior to certification of the project. (c)  The income tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall not exceed ten (10) years.  A qualified business or industry must create the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry and may elect the date upon which the ten (10) year period will begin; however, the date may not be later than twenty-four (24) months after the date the qualified business or industry begins commercial production, as such date shall be determined in accordance with a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry. (d)  In the event that the annual number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry falls below the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry, the tax exemption authorized by this subsection may be suspended by the authority pursuant to such written agreement until the number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry reaches the minimum number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to such written agreement. (6)  (a)  As used in this subsection: (i) "Affiliate" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 57-75-5(k)(iv); and (ii) "Qualified business or industry" means any company and its affiliates operating a project that has been certified by the Major Economic Impact Authority as a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii). (b)  Subject to the provisions of this subsection, a qualified business or industry shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter on income arising from a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) only, and all other income of the qualified business or industry shall be subject to the tax imposed by this chapter unless another exemption applies to such income.  The exemption does not apply to activities subject to Mississippi income tax prior to certification of the project.  The exemption authorized by this subsection shall not apply to income for any calendar year after calendar year 2026. (c)  Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the income tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall not exceed ten (10) years.  A qualified business or industry must create the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry and may elect the date upon which the ten-year period will begin, provided that such election be made in accordance with a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry. (d)  In the event that the annual number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry falls below the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry for two (2) consecutive years, the tax exemption authorized by this subsection shall be suspended until the first tax year during which the annual number of full-time jobs maintained by the qualified business or industry reaches the minimum annual number of full-time jobs required by the authority pursuant to a written agreement between the authority and such qualified business or industry. (7)  A qualified business or industry that utilizes the exemption authorized by this section shall not be eligible for the credits authorized in Sections 57-73-21 through 57-73-29. (8)  The Mississippi Development Authority may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 57-75-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-75-5.  Words and phrases used in this chapter shall have meanings as follows, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning: (a)  "Act" means the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act as originally enacted or as hereafter amended. (b) "Authority" means the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority created pursuant to the act. (c)  "Bonds" means general obligation bonds, interim notes and other evidences of debt of the State of Mississippi issued pursuant to this chapter. (d)  "Facility related to the project" means and includes any of the following, as the same may pertain to the project within the project area:  (i) facilities to provide potable and industrial water supply systems, sewage and waste disposal systems and water, natural gas and electric transmission systems to the site of the project; (ii) airports, airfields and air terminals; (iii) rail lines; (iv) port facilities; (v) highways, streets and other roadways; (vi) public school buildings, classrooms and instructional facilities, training facilities and equipment, including any functionally related facilities; (vii) parks, outdoor recreation facilities and athletic facilities; (viii) auditoriums, pavilions, campgrounds, art centers, cultural centers, folklore centers and other public facilities; (ix) health care facilities, public or private; and (x) fire protection facilities, equipment and elevated water tanks. (e)  "Person" means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary, governmental unit, public agency, political subdivision, or any other group acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular. (f) "Project" means: (i)  Any industrial, commercial, research and development, warehousing, distribution, transportation, processing, mining, United States government or tourism enterprise together with all real property required for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise with an initial capital investment of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources together with all buildings, and other supporting land and facilities, structures or improvements of whatever kind required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise; or with an initial capital investment of not less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources together with all buildings and other supporting land and facilities, structures or improvements of whatever kind required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise and which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs; or which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs which provides an average salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxation, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.  "Project" shall include any addition to or expansion of an existing enterprise if such addition or expansion has an initial capital investment of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources, or has an initial capital investment of not less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources together with all buildings and other supporting land and facilities, structures or improvements of whatever kind required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise and which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs; or which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs which * * * provides provide an average salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxation, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security. "Project" shall also include any ancillary development or business resulting from the enterprise, of which the authority is notified, within three (3) years from the date that the enterprise entered into commercial production, that the project area has been selected as the site for the ancillary development or business. (ii)  1.  Any major capital project designed to improve, expand or otherwise enhance any active duty or reserve United States armed services bases and facilities or any major Mississippi National Guard training installations, their support areas or their military operations, upon designation by the authority that any such base was or is at risk to be recommended for closure or realignment pursuant to the Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990, as amended, or other applicable federal law; or any major development project determined by the authority to be necessary to acquire or improve base properties and to provide employment opportunities through construction of projects as defined in Section 57-3-5, which shall be located on or provide direct support service or access to such military installation property in the event of closure or reduction of military operations at the installation. 2.  Any major study or investigation related to such a facility, installation or base, upon a determination by the authority that the study or investigation is critical to the expansion, retention or reuse of the facility, installation or base. 3.  Any project as defined in Section 57-3-5, any business or enterprise determined to be in the furtherance of the public purposes of this act as determined by the authority or any facility related to such project each of which shall be, directly or indirectly, related to any military base or other military-related facility no longer operated by the United States armed services or the Mississippi National Guard. (iii)  Any enterprise to be maintained, improved or constructed in Tishomingo County by or for a National Aeronautics and Space Administration facility in such county. (iv)  1.  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than Seven Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($750,000,000.00) which will create at least three thousand (3,000) jobs meeting criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority. 2. "Project" shall also include any ancillary development or business resulting from an enterprise operating a project as defined in item 1 of this paragraph (f)(iv), of which the authority is notified, within three (3) years from the date that the enterprise entered into commercial production, that the state has been selected as the site for the ancillary development or business. (v)  Any manufacturing, processing or industrial project determined by the authority, in its sole discretion, to contribute uniquely and significantly to the economic growth and development of the state, and which meets the following criteria: 1.  The project shall create at least two thousand (2,000) net new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law. 2.  The project and any facility related to the project shall include a total investment from private sources of not less than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00), or from any combination of sources of not less than Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00). (vi)  Any real property owned or controlled by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, the United States government, or any agency thereof, which is legally conveyed to the State of Mississippi or to the State of Mississippi for the benefit of the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, its successors and assigns pursuant to Section 212 of Public Law 104-99, enacted January 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 26 at 38). (vii)  Any major capital project related to the establishment, improvement, expansion and/or other enhancement of any active duty military installation and having a minimum capital investment from any source or combination of sources other than the State of Mississippi of at least Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00), and which will create at least four hundred (400) military installation related full-time jobs, which jobs may be military jobs, civilian jobs or a combination of military and civilian jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that the minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met not later than July 1, 2008. (viii)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources of not less than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) which will create at least eighty (80) full-time jobs which provide an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (ix)  Any regional retail shopping mall with an initial capital investment from private sources in excess of One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00), with a square footage in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000) square feet, which will create at least seven hundred (700) full-time jobs with an average hourly wage of Eleven Dollars ($11.00) per hour.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (x)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources of not less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) which will create at least one hundred twenty-five (125) full-time jobs which provide an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the greater.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xi)  Any potential major capital project that the authority has determined is feasible to recruit. (xii)  Any project built according to the specifications and federal provisions set forth by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration Center Operations Directorate at Stennis Space Center for the purpose of consolidating common services from National Aeronautics and Space Administration centers in human resources, procurement, financial management and information technology located on land owned or controlled by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, which will create at least four hundred seventy (470) full-time jobs. (xiii)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources of not less than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) which will create at least two hundred fifty (250) full-time jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xiv)  Any major pharmaceutical facility with a capital investment of not less than Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) made after July 1, 2002, through four (4) years after the initial date of any loan or grant made by the authority for such project, which will maintain at least seven hundred fifty (750) full-time employees.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xv)  Any pharmaceutical manufacturing, packaging and distribution facility with an initial capital investment from any local or federal sources of not less than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) which will create at least ninety (90) full-time jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xvi)  Any major industrial wood processing facility with an initial capital investment of not less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) which will create at least one hundred twenty-five (125) full-time jobs which provide an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xvii)  Any technical, engineering, manufacturing-logistic service provider with an initial capital investment of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) which will create at least ninety (90) full-time jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xviii)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources other than the State of Mississippi of not less than Six Hundred Million Dollars ($600,000,000.00) which will create at least four hundred fifty (450) full-time jobs with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xix)  Any major coal and/or petroleum coke gasification project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources other than the State of Mississippi of not less than Eight Hundred Million Dollars ($800,000,000.00), which will create at least two hundred (200) full-time jobs with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xx)  Any planned mixed use development located on not less than four thousand (4,000) acres of land that will consist of commercial, recreational, resort, tourism and residential development with a capital investment from private sources of not less than Four Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars ($475,000,000.00) in the aggregate in any one (1) or any combination of tourism projects that will create at least three thousand five hundred (3,500) jobs in the aggregate.  For the purposes of this paragraph (f)(xx), the term "tourism project" means and has the same definition as that term has in Section 57-28-1.  In order to meet the minimum capital investment required under this paragraph (f)(xx), at least Two Hundred Thirty-seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($237,500,000.00) of such investment must be made not later than June 1, 2015, and the remainder of the minimum capital investment must be made not later than June 1, 2017.  In order to meet the minimum number of jobs required to be created under this paragraph (f)(xx), at least one thousand seven hundred fifty (1,750) of such jobs must be created not later than June 1, 2015, and the remainder of the jobs must be created not later than June 1, 2017.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxi)  Any enterprise owning or operating an automotive manufacturing and assembly plant and its affiliates for which construction begins after March 2, 2007, and not later than December 1, 2007, with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) which will create at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxii)  Any enterprise owning or operating a major powertrain component manufacturing and assembly plant for which construction begins after May 11, 2007, and not later than December 1, 2007, with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual wages and taxable benefits of such jobs shall be at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxiii)  Any biological and agricultural defense project operated by an agency of the government of the United States with an initial capital investment of not less than Four Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($450,000,000.00) from any source other than the State of Mississippi and its subdivisions, which will create at least two hundred fifty (250) new full-time jobs.  All jobs created by the project must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law. (xxiv)  Any enterprise owning or operating an existing tire manufacturing plant which adds to such plant capital assets of not less than Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) after January 1, 2009, and that maintains at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) full-time jobs in this state at one (1) location with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxv)  Any enterprise owning or operating a facility for the manufacture of composite components for the aerospace industry which will have an investment from private sources of not less than One Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars ($175,000,000.00) by not later than December 31, 2015, and which will result in the full-time employment at the project site of not less than two hundred seventy-five (275) persons by December 31, 2011, and not less than four hundred twenty-five (425) persons by December 31, 2013, and not less than eight hundred (800) persons by December 31, 2017, all with an average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Fifty-three Thousand Dollars ($53,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxvi)  Any enterprise owning or operating a facility for the manufacture of pipe which will have an investment from any source other than the State of Mississippi and its subdivisions of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) by not later than December 31, 2015, and which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs within five (5) years after the start of commercial production and maintain such jobs for at least ten (10) years, all with an average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Thirty-two Thousand Dollars ($32,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxvii)  Any enterprise owning or operating a facility for the manufacture of solar panels which will have an investment from any source other than the State of Mississippi and its subdivisions of not less than One Hundred Thirty-two Million Dollars ($132,000,000.00) by not later than December 31, 2015, and which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs within five (5) years after the start of commercial production and maintain such jobs for at least ten (10) years, all with an average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Thirty-four Thousand Dollars ($34,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxviii)  1.  Any enterprise owning or operating an automotive parts manufacturing plant and its affiliates for which construction begins after June 1, 2013, and not later than June 30, 2014, with an initial capital investment of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual wages and taxable benefits of such jobs shall be at least one hundred ten percent (110%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: a.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and b.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. 2.  It is anticipated that the project defined in this subparagraph (xxviii) will expand in three (3) additional phases, will create an additional five hundred (500) full-time jobs meeting the above criteria in each phase, and will invest an additional Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) per phase. (xxix)  Any enterprise engaged in the manufacture of tires or other related rubber or automotive products for which construction of a plant begins after January 1, 2016, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2022, and for which such enterprise commits to an aggregate capital investment by such enterprise and its affiliates of not less than One Billion Four Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($1,450,000,000.00) and the creation thereby of at least two thousand five hundred (2,500) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax, of such jobs shall be at least Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for the project shall be met; and 2.  If such requirements are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise and/or its affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. (xxx)  Any enterprise owning or operating a maritime fabrication and assembly facility for which construction begins after February 1, 2016, and concludes not later than December 31, 2018, with an initial capital investment in land, buildings and equipment not less than Sixty-eight Million Dollars ($68,000,000.00) and will create not less than one thousand (1,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  If such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. (xxxi)  Each of the projects defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 and 2 that are undertaken by affiliated enterprises, together with any or all of the projects defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)3 and/or 4 if they are undertaken by the same or other enterprises affiliated with those enterprises that undertake projects defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 and 2: 1.  An enterprise engaged in the manufacturing and production of recycled flat-rolled aluminum or related products for which construction of a recycled aluminum flat-rolled mill begins after January 1, 2023, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2026; and 2.  An enterprise engaged in the manufacturing and production of biocarbon from biomass for which construction of the biocarbon manufacturing facility begins after December 1, 2022, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2026; provided that such series of projects may additionally, but shall not be required to, include: 3.  Any other affiliated enterprise that undertakes the development and operation of a new industrial or commercial facility in the state, excluding any area or areas designated by the authority in a written agreement between such enterprise or any affiliate thereof, for which the construction of any such facility begins after January 1, 2023, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2029; and/or 4.  An enterprise engaged in the development and operation of port activities (e.g., the loading and unloading of barges, rail cars and trucks, the storage and handling of materials, and other port-related operations) in support of all or any of the enterprises enumerated in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2 and 3, or otherwise in support of an existing electric arc furnace steel mill producing flat-rolled steel and related products; and for which the parent enterprise of such affiliated enterprises enumerated in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 and/or 4 commits to an aggregate, collective capital investment by one or more or any combination of such enterprises and their affiliates, as well as by any co-located customers, of not less than Two Billion Five Hundred Million Dollars ($2,500,000,000.00) and the creation thereby of at least one thousand (1,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax, of such jobs shall be at least Ninety-three Thousand Dollars ($93,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: a. Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for such affiliated projects shall be met; and b.  If such requirements are not collectively met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for such affiliated projects may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprises and/or their affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxi), A. a co-located customer shall mean a person who locates and operates any new manufacturing, processing, warehousing and/or distribution facility within the project area for the project defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 and utilizes, directly or indirectly, in its operations any aluminum or related products produced by such project, and B. an affiliated enterprise or an affiliate means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 or 4.  References in the act to a project, as defined by this paragraph (f)(xxxi) shall mean any one of, any combination or all of the projects as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 or 4. (xxxii)  Any enterprise engaged in the manufacture and assembly of battery cells for electric commercial vehicles and industrial applications, for which construction of a manufacturing and assembly plant begins after January 1, 2024, and the manufacturing and assembly of battery cells thereby commences on or prior to December 31, 2029, and for which such enterprise commits to an aggregate, collective capital investment by such enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, of not less than One Billion Nine Hundred Million Dollars ($1,900,000,000.00) and the creation by such enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, as well as by any other co-located project participant, of at least two thousand (2,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax prior to January 1, 2024, of such jobs shall be at least Sixty-five Thousand Five Hundred Sixty-four Dollars ($65,564.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for such affiliated projects shall be met; and 2.  If such requirements are not collectively met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for such project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise and/or its affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxii), a co-located project participant shall mean a person or business entity that, pursuant to one or more contracts with an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxii) or an affiliate thereof, performs within the project area one or more of the following:  a. storage, handling and processing services for raw materials, work in process and/or finished goods inventories; b. maintenance, operation and/or other servicing of equipment and machinery used in the project; c. management of real and tangible personal property used in the project; d. any manufacturing, processing or assembly work, in each instance with respect to the manufacturing and/or assembly of battery cells for electric commercial vehicles or industrial applications manufactured or otherwise assembled within the project area by such enterprise or an affiliate thereof; or e. the supply to such enterprise or any affiliate thereof of any components, parts or materials of any battery cells for electric commercial vehicles or industrial applications manufactured or otherwise assembled within the project area by such enterprise or any affiliate thereof. (xxxiii)  Any enterprise engaged in data processing, for which construction of a data processing facility or facilities begins after January 1, 2024, the processing of data by at least one (1) data processing facility commences on or prior to * * *December 31, 2027 March 31, 2028, and for which such enterprise commits to an aggregate, collective capital investment by such enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, of not less than Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000.00) and the creation by such enterprise, one or more affiliates or contractors of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprises and its affiliates, as well as by any other co-located project participant, of at least one thousand (1,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax prior to January 1, 2024, of such jobs shall be at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the published average annual wage of the state as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for such affiliated projects shall be met; and 2.  If such requirements are not collectively met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for such project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise and/or its affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxiii), a co-located project participant shall mean a person or business entity that, pursuant to one or more contracts with an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxiii) or an affiliate thereof, performs within the project area one or more of the following:  a. maintenance, operation and/or other servicing of equipment and machinery used in the project; b. management of real and tangible personal property used in the project; or c. the supply to such enterprise or any affiliate thereof of any components, parts or services within the project area by such enterprise or any affiliate thereof. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxiii), "project" shall include the construction of additional data processing facilities or the expansion of existing data processing facilities within the state by the enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise, or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, if such construction or expansion has a minimum capital investment of Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) and creates at least fifty (50) net new full-time jobs and written notice thereof is provided to the authority. (g)  (i)  "Project area" means the project site, together with any area or territory within the state lying within sixty-five (65) miles of any portion of the project site whether or not such area or territory be contiguous; however, for the project defined in paragraph (f)(iv) and (xxxiii) of this section the term "project area" means any area or territory within the state.  The project area shall also include all territory within a county if any portion of such county lies within sixty-five (65) miles of any portion of the project site.  "Project site" means the real property on which the principal facilities of the enterprise will operate; however, for the project defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section, the term "project site" means any area or territory within the state upon which an enterprise constructs one or more data processing facilities.  The provisions of this subparagraph (i) shall not apply to a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi) of this section. (ii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi) of this section, the term "project area" means the acreage authorized in the certificate of convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Development Authority to a regional economic development alliance under Section 57-64-1 et seq. (iii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in either paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 or paragraph (f)(xxxii) of this section, the term "project area" means the acreage specified by the authority in written agreement with the enterprise undertaking such project and/or an affiliate thereof. (h)  "Public agency" means: (i)  Any department, board, commission, institution or other agency or instrumentality of the state; (ii)  Any city, town, county, political subdivision, school district or other district created or existing under the laws of the state or any public agency of any such city, town, county, political subdivision or district or any other public entity created or existing under local and private legislation; (iii)  Any department, commission, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America; and (iv)  Any other state of the United States of America which may be cooperating with respect to location of the project within the state, or any agency thereof. (i)  "State" means State of Mississippi. (j)  "Fee-in-lieu" means a negotiated fee to be paid by the project in lieu of any franchise taxes imposed on the project by Chapter 13, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The fee-in-lieu shall not be less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) annually.  A fee-in-lieu may be negotiated with an enterprise operating an existing project defined in paragraph (f)(iv)1 of this section; however, a fee-in-lieu shall not be negotiated for other existing enterprises that fall within the definition of the term "project." (k)  (i) "Affiliate" means a subsidiary or related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi), paragraph (f)(xxviii) or paragraph (f)(xxix) of this section.  The subsidiary or related business must provide services directly related to the core activities of the project. (ii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxi) of this section, an "affiliated enterprise" or an "affiliate" means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 or 4 of this section. (iii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxii) of this section, an "affiliated enterprise" or an "affiliate" means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxii) of this section. (iv)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section, an "affiliated enterprise" or an "affiliate" means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section; provided, any such related business entity may be excluded from this definition pursuant to the terms of a written agreement between the authority and the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section. (l)  "Tier One supplier" means a supplier of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi) of this section that is certified by the enterprise owning the project and creates a minimum of fifty (50) new full-time jobs. SECTION 3.  Section 27-31-104, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Through June 30, * * *2026 2029, this section shall read as follows:] 27-31-104. (1)  (a)  County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities are each hereby authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement with an enterprise granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, including ad valorem taxes levied for school purposes, for the following: (i) Projects totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by any new enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; (ii) Projects by a private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5) having a minimum capital investment of Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00); (iii) Projects by a qualified business (as such term is defined in Section 57-117-3) meeting minimum criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority; (iv) Projects, in addition to those projects referenced in Section 27-31-105, totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by an existing enterprise that has been doing business in the county or municipality for twenty-four (24) months.  For purposes of this subparagraph (iv), the term "existing enterprise" includes those enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; or (v) A private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5) or entity defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i) having a minimum capital investment of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) from any source or combination of sources, provided that a majority of the capital investment is from private sources, when such project is located within a geographic area for which a Presidential Disaster Declaration was issued on or after January 1, 2014. County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities may not enter into an agreement with an enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment, as defined in Section 41-137-3 of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes. (b) A fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted in accordance with this section may include any or all tangible property, real or personal, including any leasehold interests therein but excluding automobiles and trucks operating on and over the highways of the State of Mississippi, used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of any enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, whether or not such property is owned, leased, subleased, licensed or otherwise obtained by such enterprise, private company or business, as applicable, irrespective of the taxpayer to which any such leased property is assessed for ad valorem tax purposes.  If a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes is granted pursuant to this section with respect to any leasehold interest under a lease, sublease or license of tangible property used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, the corresponding ownership interest of the owner, lessor and sublessor of such tangible property shall similarly and automatically be exempt and subject to the fee-in-lieu granted in accordance herewith without any action being required to be taken by such owner, lessor or sublessor. (2) A county board of supervisors may enter into a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the county and any county school district, and a municipality may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the municipality and any municipal school district located in the municipality; however, if the project is located outside the limits of a municipality but within the boundaries of the municipal school district, then the county board of supervisors may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the school district granting a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes for school district purposes. (3) Any grant of a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes shall be evidenced by a written agreement negotiated by the enterprise and the county board of supervisors and/or municipal authority, as the case may be, and given final approval by the Mississippi Development Authority as satisfying the requirements of this section. (4) (a)  The minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu shall not be less than one-third (1/3), or one-tenth (1/10) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, of the ad valorem levy, including ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, and except as otherwise provided, the sum allowed shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, however, except as otherwise provided in this section, from the sum allowed the apportionment to school districts shall not be less than the school districts' pro rata share based upon the proportion that the millage imposed for the school districts by the appropriate levying authority bears to the millage imposed by such levying authority for all other county or municipal purposes.  Any fee-in-lieu agreement entered into under this section shall become a binding obligation of the parties to the agreement, be effective upon its execution by the parties and approval by the Mississippi Development Authority and, except as otherwise provided in Section 17-25-23 or Section 57-75-33, or any other provision of law, continue in effect for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years commencing on the date that the fee-in-lieu granted thereunder begins in accordance with the agreement; however, no particular parcel of land, real property improvement or item of personal property shall be subject to a fee-in-lieu for a duration of more than ten (10) years.  Any such agreement shall be binding, according to its terms, on future boards of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of a municipality, as the case may be, for the duration of the agreement. (b) For any project with a capital investment in excess of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00) for which a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into after July 1, 2026, or for which a fee-in-lieu agreement was entered into before July 1, 2026, but for which no property subject to the agreement was entered on a tax roll and liable for taxation before January 1, 2026, of the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu on the portion of the project in excess of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00): (i) forty percent (40%) shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection and (ii) sixty percent (60%) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Strategic Development Fund created in Section 4 of this act.  However, for a project for which a fee-in-lieu agreement was entered into before July 1, 2026, but for which no property subject to the agreement was entered on a tax roll and liable for taxation before January 1, 2026, amounts remitted to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, under subsection (10) of this section shall be credited against the state's sixty percent (60%) portion of the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu. In addition, all capital investment for a project, regardless of ownership or other interest of any enterprise providing investment and/or ownership or other interest in property that is part of the project and subject to a fee-in-lieu agreement, shall be considered to be part of the total aggregate capital investment for purposes of determining whether the capital investment for the project is in excess of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00). (5) The fee-in-lieu may be a stated fraction or percentage of the ad valorem taxes otherwise payable or a stated dollar amount.  If the fee is a fraction or percentage of the ad valorem tax levy, it shall be annually computed on all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable, including school taxes, as the same may vary from year to year based upon changes in the millage rate or assessed value and shall not be less than one-third (1/3) of that amount or one-tenth (1/10) of that amount if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026.  If the fee is a stated dollar amount, said amount shall be the higher of the sum provided for fixed payment or (a) one-third (1/3) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu or (b) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, one-tenth (1/10) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu. (6) Notwithstanding Section 27-31-111, the parties to a fee-in-lieu may agree on terms and conditions providing for the reduction, suspension, termination or reinstatement of a fee-in-lieu agreement or any fee-in-lieu period granted thereunder upon the cessation of operations by project for twelve (12) or more consecutive months or due to other conditions set forth in the agreement. (7) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) and located in a county that is a member of a regional economic development alliance created under Section 57-64-1 et seq., the members of the regional economic development alliance may divide the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu in a manner as determined by the alliance agreement, and the boards of supervisors of the member counties may then apportion the sum allowed between school district purposes and all other county purposes. (8) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), the board of supervisors of the county in which the project is located may negotiate with the school district in which the project is located and apportion to the school district an amount of the fee-in-lieu that is agreed upon in the negotiations different than the amount provided for in subsection (3) of this section. (9) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), the annual amount of the fee-in-lieu apportioned to the county shall not be less than the amount necessary to pay the debt service on bonds issued by the county pursuant to Section 57-75-37(3)(c). (10) For any county and/or municipality that enters into a fee-in-lieu agreement for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), the minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu for the project shall not be less than one-third (1/3); provided that such allowed sum of each annual fee-in-lieu payment may be first apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in any such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, to either: (a) first allocate and remit to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment to repay to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, funds advanced thereby to such county and/or municipality or to other public agency, as defined in Section 57-75-37(7)(a)(ii), to fund public improvements and related costs for the project pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(c)(iii); or (b) first allocate and remit to the enterprise owning and/or operating the project such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment payable thereto pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(d)(iv).  The balance of any annual fee-in-lieu amount remaining after such initial allocation and remittance to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, Mississippi Development Authority or enterprise owning and/or operating the project, as applicable, shall then be apportioned in accordance with subsection (4) of this section or as otherwise authorized by state law. (11) Any fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted under this section before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. [From and after July 1, * * *2026 2029, this section shall read as follows:] 27-31-104. (1)  (a)  County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities are each hereby authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement with an enterprise granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, including ad valorem taxes levied for school purposes, for the following: (i) Projects totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by any new enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; (ii) Projects by a private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5, Mississippi Code of 1972) having a minimum capital investment of Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00); (iii) Projects, in addition to those projects referenced in Section 27-31-105, totaling over Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) by an existing enterprise that has been doing business in the county or municipality for twenty-four (24) months.  For purposes of this subparagraph (iii), the term "existing enterprise" includes those enterprises enumerated in Section 27-31-101; or (iv) A private company (as such term is defined in Section 57-61-5) or entity defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i) having a minimum capital investment of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) from any source or combination of sources, provided that a majority of the capital investment is from private sources, when such project is located within a geographic area for which a Presidential Disaster Declaration was issued on or after January 1, 2014. County boards of supervisors and municipal authorities may not enter into an agreement with an enterprise that is a medical cannabis establishment, as defined in Section 41-137-3 of the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act, granting, and pursuant to such agreement grant a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes. (b) A fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted in accordance with this section may include any or all tangible property, real or personal, including any leasehold interests therein but excluding automobiles and trucks operating on and over the highways of the State of Mississippi, used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of any enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, whether or not such property is owned, leased, subleased, licensed or otherwise obtained by such enterprise, private company or business, as applicable, irrespective of the taxpayer to which any such leased property is assessed for ad valorem tax purposes.  If a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes is granted pursuant to this section with respect to any leasehold interest under a lease, sublease or license of tangible property used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise, private company or business described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), as applicable, the corresponding ownership interest of the owner, lessor and sublessor of such tangible property shall similarly and automatically be exempt and subject to the fee-in-lieu granted in accordance herewith without any action being required to be taken by such owner, lessor or sublessor. (2) A county board of supervisors may enter into a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the county and any county school district, and a municipality may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the municipality and any municipal school district located in the municipality; however, if the project is located outside the limits of a municipality but within the boundaries of the municipal school district, then the county board of supervisors may enter into such a fee-in-lieu agreement on behalf of the school district granting a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes for school district purposes. (3) Any grant of a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes shall be evidenced by a written agreement negotiated by the enterprise and the county board of supervisors and/or municipal authority, as the case may be, and given final approval by the Mississippi Development Authority as satisfying the requirements of this section. (4) (a)  The minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu shall not be less than one-third (1/3), or one-tenth (1/10) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, of the ad valorem levy, including ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, and except as otherwise provided, the sum allowed shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, however, except as otherwise provided in this section, from the sum allowed the apportionment to school districts shall not be less than the school districts' pro rata share based upon the proportion that the millage imposed for the school districts by the appropriate levying authority bears to the millage imposed by such levying authority for all other county or municipal purposes.  Any fee-in-lieu agreement entered into under this section shall become a binding obligation of the parties to the agreement, be effective upon its execution by the parties and approval by the Mississippi Development Authority and, except as otherwise provided in Section 17-25-23 or Section 57-75-33, or any other provision of law, continue in effect for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years commencing on the date that the fee-in-lieu granted thereunder begins in accordance with the agreement; however, no particular parcel of land, real property improvement or item of personal property shall be subject to a fee-in-lieu for a duration of more than ten (10) years.  Any such agreement shall be binding, according to its terms, on future boards of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of a municipality, as the case may be, for the duration of the agreement. (b) For any project with a capital investment in excess of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00) for which a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into after July 1, 2026, or for which a fee-in-lieu agreement was entered into before July 1, 2026, but for which no property subject to the agreement was entered on a tax roll and liable for taxation before January 1, 2026, of the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu on the portion of the project in excess of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00): (i) forty percent (40%) shall be apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection and (ii) sixty percent (60%) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Strategic Development Fund created in Section 4 of this act.  However, for a project for which a fee-in-lieu agreement was entered into before July 1, 2026, but for which no property subject to the agreement was entered on a tax roll and liable for taxation before January 1, 2026, amounts remitted to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, under subsection (10) of this section shall be credited against the state's sixty percent (60%) portion of the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu.  In addition, all capital investment for a project, regardless of ownership or other interest of any enterprise providing investment and/or ownership or other interest in property that is part of the project and subject to a fee-in-lieu agreement, shall be considered to be part of the total aggregate capital investment for purposes of determining whether the capital investment for the project is in excess of Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00). (5) The fee-in-lieu may be a stated fraction or percentage of the ad valorem taxes otherwise payable or a stated dollar amount.  If the fee is a fraction or percentage of the ad valorem tax levy, it shall be annually computed on all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable, including school taxes, as the same may vary from year to year based upon changes in the millage rate or assessed value and shall not be less than one-third (1/3) of that amount or one-tenth (1/10) of that amount if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026.  If the fee is a stated dollar amount, said amount shall be the higher of the sum provided for fixed payment or (a) one-third (1/3) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu or (b) if the project is also a project eligible for an ad valorem tax exemption under Section 27-31-46 and a fee-in-lieu agreement is entered into before July 1, 2026, one-tenth (1/10) of the total of all ad valorem taxes otherwise payable as annually determined during each year of the fee-in-lieu. (6) Notwithstanding Section 27-31-111, the parties to a fee-in-lieu may agree on terms and conditions providing for the reduction, suspension, termination or reinstatement of a fee-in-lieu agreement or any fee-in-lieu period granted thereunder upon the cessation of operations by project for twelve (12) or more consecutive months or due to other conditions set forth in the agreement. (7) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) and located in a county that is a member of a regional economic development alliance created under Section 57-64-1 et seq., the members of the regional economic development alliance may divide the sum allowed as a fee-in-lieu in a manner as determined by the alliance agreement, and the boards of supervisors of the member counties may then apportion the sum allowed between school district purposes and all other county purposes. (8) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi), the board of supervisors of the county in which the project is located may negotiate with the school district in which the project is located and apportion to the school district an amount of the fee-in-lieu that is agreed upon in the negotiations different than the amount provided for in subsection (3) of this section. (9) For a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii), the annual amount of the fee-in-lieu apportioned to the county shall not be less than the amount necessary to pay the annual debt service on bonds issued by the county pursuant to Section 57-75-37(3)(c). (10) For any county and/or municipality that enters into a fee-in-lieu agreement for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii), the minimum sum allowable as a fee-in-lieu for the project shall not be less than one-third (1/3); provided that such allowed sum of each annual fee-in-lieu payment may be first apportioned between the county or municipality, as appropriate, and the school districts in any such amounts as may be determined by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be, to either: (a) first allocate and remit to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment to repay to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority or the Mississippi Development Authority, as applicable, funds advanced thereby to such county and/or municipality or to other public agency, as defined in Section 57-75-37(7)(a)(ii), to fund public improvements and related costs for the project pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(c)(iii); or (b) first allocate and remit to the enterprise owning and/or operating the project such portion of each annual fee-in-lieu payment payable thereto pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with Section 57-75-37(7)(d)(iv).  The balance of any annual fee-in-lieu amount remaining after such initial allocation and remittance to the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, Mississippi Development Authority or enterprise owning and/or operating the project, as applicable, shall then be apportioned in accordance with subsection (4) of this section or as otherwise authorized by state law. (11) Any fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes granted under this section before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. SECTION 4.  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Strategic Development Fund", which shall consist of funds deposited therein under Section 27-31-104(4)(b), Mississippi Code of 1972, and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund that are derived from a project described in Section 27-31-104(4)(b), shall be expended by the Mississippi Development Authority, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for making strategic investments in major transportation and other infrastructure projects that support the county in which the project is located and the surrounding geographical area for the purpose of promoting and supporting economic development and improving transportation related capabilities and other public infrastructure.  Other monies in the fund shall be expended by the Mississippi Development Authority, upon appropriation by the Legislature, making strategic infrastructure investments, furthering economic development and making quality of life improvements statewide. SECTION 5.  Section 27-31-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-31-105. (1)  Any person, firm or corporation who owns or operates a manufacturing or other enterprise of public utility as enumerated in Section 27-31-101 and who makes additions to or expansions of the facilities or properties or replaces equipment used in connection with or necessary to the operation of such enterprise may be granted an exemption from ad valorem taxation, except state ad valorem taxation, ad valorem taxes for school district purposes, and ad valorem taxes on the products thereof or on automobiles and trucks belonging thereto and operating on and over the highways of the State of Mississippi, upon each addition to or expansion of the facility or property or replacement of equipment, used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise enumerated in Section 27-31-101, whether or not such property is owned, leased, subleased, licensed or otherwise obtained by such enterprise, irrespective of the taxpayer to which any such leased property is assessed for ad valorem tax purposes, within the discretion of the county board of supervisors and municipal authorities; however, such governing authorities shall not exempt ad valorem taxes for school district purposes on such additions or expansions of the facility or property, or replacement of equipment.  If an exemption is granted pursuant to this subsection (1) with respect to any leasehold interest under a lease, sublease or license of tangible property used in connection with, or necessary to, the operation of an enterprise enumerated in Section 27-31-101, the corresponding ownership interest of the owner, lessor and sublessor of such tangible property shall similarly and automatically be exempt without any action being required to be taken by such owner, lessor or sublessor.  In order to obtain the exemptions authorized by this section, a person, firm or corporation shall follow the same procedure prescribed for obtaining an exemption on a new enterprise, except as otherwise provided in this section.  For any additions, expansions or replacements with reference to any particular new enterprise, which have been completed during any calendar year, only one (1) request must be made for the exemptions sought for the additions, expansions or replacements.  The time of the exemption shall commence from the date of completion of the additions, expansions or replacements, and shall extend for a period not to exceed ten (10) years thereafter; however, boards of supervisors and municipal authorities, in lieu of granting the exemption for one (1) period of ten (10) years, may grant the exemption in consecutive periods of five (5) years each, but the total of such consecutive periods shall not exceed ten (10) years.  The initial request for an exemption must be made in writing by June 1 of the year immediately following the year in which the additions, expansions or replacements are completed.  If the initial request for the exemption is not timely made, the board of supervisors or municipal authorities may grant a subsequent request for the exemption and, in such case, the exemption shall begin on the anniversary date of completion of the additions, expansions or replacements in the year in which the request is made and may be for a period of time extending not more than ten (10) years from the date of completion of the additions, expansions or replacements.  Any subsequent request for the exemption must be made in writing by June 1 of the year in which it is granted.  Any exemption from ad valorem taxes granted under this subsection (1) before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. (2) For expansions of facilities or properties, or replacement of equipment, county boards of supervisors and municipal authorities may grant a fee in lieu of taxes in the same manner, to the same extent, and with the same qualifying threshold as provided for projects under Section 27-31-104, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Any fee-in-lieu of taxes granted under this subsection (2) before March 28, 2019, and consistent herewith, is hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. SECTION 6.  Section 19-9-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-9-151.  The in-lieu payments made to the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue pursuant to Section 27-35-309(3)(b), excluding payments made in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) * * *which are required to be paid into the General Fund of the state, shall be distributed by the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue as follows: (a)  For fiscal year 1987, fifty percent (50%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (b)  For fiscal year 1988, forty-five percent (45%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (c)  For fiscal year 1989, forty percent (40%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (d)  For fiscal year 1990, thirty-five (35%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (e)  For fiscal year 1991 and thereafter, thirty percent (30%) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (f)  For fiscal year 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) of such payment shall be paid to the situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located; (g)  For fiscal year 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) of such payment shall be paid to Jefferson County, Mississippi. The funds received by Jefferson County, Mississippi, under this section, shall be expended by the county solely for road, bridge and other transportation infrastructure directly related to disaster and emergency preparedness and response for risks associated with being adjacent to the situs county wherein which such nuclear generating plant is located and proximity to the nuclear generating plant. SECTION 7.  Section 19-9-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-9-153.  Of the funds received pursuant to Section 19-9-151 by a situs county wherein such nuclear generating plant is located, excluding funds received pursuant to Section 19-9-151(f), the board of supervisors of such situs county shall distribute ten percent (10%) of each payment, upon receipt, to the most populous incorporated municipality within the county; however, if such plant is located within a municipality, such payments which would otherwise be made to the situs county pursuant to Section 19-9-151 shall be divided equally between the situs county and situs municipality. SECTION 8.  Section 19-9-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-9-155.  Of the funds retained by the situs county after the payment made pursuant to Section 19-9-153, * * *not more than Five Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($5,500,000.00) per year One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) per year shall be expended by the situs county solely for road, bridge and other transportation infrastructure directly related to disaster and emergency preparedness and response for risks associated with being the situs county wherein which such nuclear generating plant is located, and the remaining funds may be expended by the board of supervisors of the county for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax * * *, and any funds in excess of such amounts shall be expended in accordance with Section 19‑9‑157. SECTION 9.  Section 27-35-309, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-35-309.  (1)  The Department of Revenue shall, if practicable, on or before the first Monday of June of each year, make out for each person, firm, company or corporation listed in Section 27-35-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, an assessment of the company's property, both real and personal, tangible and intangible.  The Department of Revenue shall apportion the assessment of value of each company's property according to the provisions of this article, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, as follows: (a)  When the property of such public service company is located in more than one (1) county in this state, the Department of Revenue shall direct the company to apportion the assessed value between the counties and municipalities and all other taxing districts therein, in the proportion which the property located therein bears to the entire value of the property of such company as valued by the department, so that to each county, municipality and taxing district therein, there shall be apportioned such part of the entire valuation as will fairly equalize the relative value of the property therein located to the whole value thereof. (b)  When the property of such public utility required to be assessed by the provisions of this article is located in more than one (1) state, the assessed value thereof shall be apportioned by the Department of Revenue in such manner as will fairly and equitably determine the principal sum for the value thereof in this state, and after ascertaining such value it shall be apportioned by them as herein provided. The assessment roll shall contain all the property of any such public service company, railroad, person, firm or corporation and the value thereof, and so made that each county, municipality, and taxing district shall receive its just share of taxes proportionately to the amount of property therein situated. (2)  (a)  The assessment when made shall remain open for twenty (20) days in the Office of the Department of Revenue, and be for such time subject to the objections thereto which may be filed with the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals; but real estate belonging to railroads and which forms no part of the road, and is wholly disconnected from its railroad business, shall not be assessed by the Department of Revenue, but shall be assessed as other real estate is assessed by the tax assessor of the county where situated. (b)  The apportionment of the assessed value as required by this section shall be filed with the Department of Revenue by such public service company on or before the last day of the objection period established in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2). If such company shall fail, refuse or neglect to render the apportionment of assessed value as required by this section, such company shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Section 27-35-305.  The filing of an objection by such public service company shall not preclude such company from filing the property apportionment as required by this section. (3)  Any nuclear generating plant which is located in the state, which is owned or operated by a public utility rendering electric service within the state and not exempt from ad valorem taxation under any other statute and which is not owned or operated by an instrumentality of the federal government shall be exempt from county, municipal and district ad valorem taxes.  In lieu of the payment of county, municipal and district ad valorem taxes, such public utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum based on the assessed value of such nuclear generating plant in an amount to be determined and distributed as follows: (a)  The Department of Revenue shall annually assign an assessed value to any nuclear generating plant described in this subsection in the same manner as for ad valorem tax purposes by using accepted industry methods for appraising and assessing public utility property.  The assessed value assigned shall be used for the purpose of determining the in-lieu tax due under this section and shall not be included on the ad valorem tax rolls of the situs taxing authority nor be subject to ad valorem taxation by the situs taxing authority nor shall the assessed value assigned be used in determining the debt limit of the situs taxing authority. However, the assessed value so assigned may be used by the situs taxing authority for the purpose of determining salaries of its public officials. (b)  On or before February 1, 1987, for the 1986 taxable year and on or before February 1 of each year through the 1989 taxable year, such utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum equal to two percent (2%) of the assessed value as ascertained by the Department of Revenue, but such payment shall not be less than Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) for any of the four (4) taxable years; all such payments in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) for these four (4) taxable years shall be paid into the General Fund of the state.  On or before February 1, 1991, for the 1990 taxable year and on or before February 1 of each year thereafter, such utility shall pay to the Department of Revenue a sum equal to two percent (2%) of the assessed value as ascertained by the Department of Revenue, but such payment shall not be less than Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) for any taxable year for as long as such nuclear power plant is licensed to operate and is not being permanently decommissioned; all such payments in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) for taxable years 1990 and thereafter shall be paid as follows: (i)  An amount of Three Million Forty Thousand Dollars ($3,040,000.00) annually, beginning with fiscal year 1991, shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue to Claiborne County.  Such payments may be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County for any purpose for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321.  However, should the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County withdraw its support of the Grand Gulf Nuclear Station off-site emergency plan or otherwise fail to satisfy its off-site emergency plan commitments as determined by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) annually of the funds designated for Claiborne County as described by this * * *subsection subparagraph (i) shall be deposited in the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Fund as provided in Section 33-15-51. (ii)  An amount of One Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($160,000.00) annually, beginning with fiscal year 1991, shall be transferred by the Department of Revenue to the City of Port Gibson, Mississippi.  Such payments may be expended by the Board of Aldermen of the City of Port Gibson for any purpose for which a municipality is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321. However, should the Board of Aldermen of the City of Port Gibson withdraw its support of the Grand Gulf Nuclear Station off-site emergency plan or otherwise fail to satisfy its off-site emergency plan commitment, as determined by the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) annually of the funds designated for the City of Port Gibson as described by this * * *subsection subparagraph (ii) shall be deposited in the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Fund as provided in Section 33-15-51. (iii)  The remaining balance of the payments in excess of Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) annually, less amounts transferred under (i) and (ii) of this subsection, beginning with fiscal year 1991, shall be allocated in accordance with subsection (3)(f) of this section. (c)  Pursuant to certification by the Attorney General to the State Treasurer and the Department of Revenue that the suit against the State of Mississippi pending on the effective date of House Bill 8, First Extraordinary Session of 1990, [Laws, 1990 Ex Session, Ch. 12, eff June 26, 1990], in the Chancery Court for the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, styled Albert Butler et al v. the Mississippi State Tax Commission et al, has been voluntarily dismissed with prejudice as to all plaintiffs at the request of the complainants and that no attorney's fees or court costs have been assessed against the state and each of the parties, including Claiborne County and each municipality and school district located in the county, have signed and delivered to the Attorney General a full and complete release in favor of the State of Mississippi and its elected officials of all claims that have been asserted or may be asserted in the suit pending on the effective date of House Bill 8, First Extraordinary Session of 1990, [Laws, 1990 Ex Session, Ch. 12, eff June 26, 1990], in the Chancery Court for the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, styled Albert Butler et al v. the Mississippi State Tax Commission et al, and the deposit into the State General Fund of in-lieu payments and interest thereon due the state under subsection (3)(b) of this section but placed in escrow because of the lawsuit described above, the state shall promptly transfer to the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County out of the State General Fund an amount of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) which shall be a one-time distribution to Claiborne County from the state.  Such payment may be expended by the Board of Supervisors of Claiborne County for any purposes for which a county is authorized by law to levy an ad valorem tax and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes for the 1991 fiscal year under Sections 27-39-321 and 27-39-305. (d)  After distribution of the one-time payment to Claiborne County as set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the Department of Revenue upon certification that the pending lawsuit as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section has been voluntarily dismissed shall promptly deposit an amount of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) into the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund as provided for in Section 33-15-51, which shall be a one-time payment, to be utilized in accordance with the provisions of such section. (e)  After distribution of the one-time payment to Claiborne County as set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section and the payment to the Grand Gulf Disaster Assistance Trust Fund as set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section, the Department of Revenue upon certification that the pending lawsuit as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section has been voluntarily dismissed shall promptly distribute ten percent (10%) of the remainder of the prior payments remaining in escrow to the General Fund of the state and the balance of the prior payments remaining in escrow shall be distributed to the counties and municipalities in this state wherein such public utility has rendered electric service in the proportion that the amount of electric energy consumed by the retail customers of such public utility in each county, excluding municipalities therein, and in each municipality, for the next preceding fiscal year bears to the total amount of electric energy consumed by all retail customers of such public utility in the State of Mississippi for the next preceding fiscal year.  The payments distributed to the counties and municipalities under this paragraph (e) may be expended by such counties and municipalities for any lawful purpose and shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-321 and 27-39-305. (f)  After distribution of the payments for fiscal year 1991 as set forth in Section 19-9-151 and distribution of the payments as provided for in subsection (3)(b) of this section, and ending with fiscal year 2026, the Department of Revenue shall distribute ten percent (10%) of the remainder of the payments to the General Fund of the state and the balance to the counties and municipalities in this state wherein such public utility renders electric service in the proportion that the amount of electric energy consumed by the retail customers of such public utility in each county, excluding municipalities therein, and in each municipality for the next preceding fiscal year bears to the total amount of electric energy consumed by all retail customers of such public utility in the State of Mississippi for the next preceding fiscal year. Beginning with fiscal year 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter, after distribution of the payments for fiscal year 2027 as set forth in Section 19-9-151 and distribution of the payments as provided for in subsection (3)(b) of this section, the Department of Revenue shall distribute One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) of the remainder of the payments to the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and the balance to the counties and municipalities in this state wherein such public utility renders electric service in the proportion that the amount of electric energy consumed by the retail customers of such public utility in each county, excluding municipalities therein, and in each municipality for the next preceding fiscal year bears to the total amount of electric energy consumed by all retail customers of such public utility in the State of Mississippi for the next preceding fiscal year. (g)  Through fiscal year 2026, no county, including municipalities therein, shall receive in excess of twenty percent (20%) of the funds distributed under paragraph (f) of this subsection.  Beginning with fiscal year 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter, no county, including municipalities therein, shall receive in excess of five percent (5%) of the funds distributed under paragraph (f) of this subsection; however, this limitation shall not apply to funds distributed to the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (h)  The revenues received by counties and municipalities under paragraph (f) of this subsection shall not be included or considered as proceeds of ad valorem taxes for the purposes of the growth limitation on ad valorem taxes under Sections 27-39-305 and 27-39-321. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.